Nebraska, session 109, LB808.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB808 LB808
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 71-1908, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
71-1908 (1) Sections 71-1908 to 71-1923.03 and sections 2 and 3 of
this act shall be known and may be cited as the Child Care Licensing Act.
(2) The Legislature finds that there is a present and growing need
for quality child care programs and facilities. There is a need to
establish and maintain licensure of persons providing such programs to
ensure that such persons are competent and are using safe and adequate
facilities. The Legislature further finds and declares that the
development and supervision of programs are a matter of statewide concern
and should be dealt with uniformly on the state and local levels. There
is a need for cooperation among the various state and local agencies
which impose standards on licensees, and there should be one agency which
coordinates the enforcement of such standards and informs the Legislature
about cooperation among the various agencies.
Sec. 2. (1) The Director of Public Health of the Division of Public
Health of the Department of Health and Human Services may enter into a
contract with any number of licensees to develop and operate a pilot
program designed to increase the availability or capacity of day care
facilities in the state.
(2) The director may grant licensure to a person to maintain a
facility in a pilot program under this section that waives the
requirements of the rules and regulations related to licensure and
operation of a day care facility or youth development program, including
requirements for staff at such day care facility or youth development
program. A facility granted a license pursuant to this section shall
comply with alternative terms, conditions, and requirements established
by the director as may be necessary to protect the health, safety, and
welfare of the children who attend such facility.
(3) The director shall not grant a license under this section if the
director determines that a day care facility or youth development program
-2-

LB808 LB808
2026 2026
or a staff member of such facility or program would endanger the health,
safety, and welfare of a child.
(4) The director may grant licensure to a person to maintain a
facility under this section for no more than five years.
(5) If the director determines that a pilot program established
under this section is successful and increases the availability or
capacity of child care facilities in the state, the director shall make
suggestions and recommendations to the Legislature for statutory changes.
Sec. 3. A person granted licensure to maintain a facility may
request a waiver from the requirements of the Child Care Licensing Act
for a specific period of time from the Director of Public Health. A
waiver request shall be in a form and manner approved by the director and
contain the provisions of the rules and regulations sought to be waived.
Waiver requests shall be granted on a case-by-case basis.
Sec. 4. Original section 71-1908, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-3-